App/Scribus/share/dicts/hyph_id.dic
1r2en1ca1
1r2en1ca2h
1r2en1ca1n2a3k2
ren1da
ren1da2h1
1ren1de2ng
re1ngam
re1ngas
1re1nge2h1
re1nge2k1
re1ngu2s1
re1ngu2t1
ren1t
1r2en1te2t1
1r2e1pe2t1
r2e1pe3t2i1
re1po2t1
re1p2re
re1pro
1r2es
re1sa
re1sa2h1
re1sa2p1
re1so
re1sor2t
res1t
res1to1r2a
re1ta
re1ta2k1
re1t2e
re3t2e2l1
re1to1ri
re1tr
re2t1ret
re2t1ri
re1tro1
re1u1ni
re2u1ni1a
r1f
r1g
r1h
ri1a
ri1a2p1
ri1bu
ri1bu2t1
ri1bu2t1an
ri1cu2h1
ri3k2i2l1
ri3ki2t1
1r2i1la
1r2i1la1ku1
ri1ma
ri1ma2u
rim1b
rim1bu2n1
rim1pet
ri2n1c
1r2i2n1ci
ri2n1d
ri2ng
ri3nga2h1
1ri3nga2i1
ri3nga2n1
ri3ng2a2n1an
ri2ng1g
ri2ng1gi2t1
ri3nging
ri3ngis
ri2ng1k
ri2ng1ka2s1
ri2ng1ku2k1
ri2n1j
ri2n1t
rin1ta2ng3
rin1ti2h1
rin1ti2l1
rin1ti2s1
ri1pa
ri3p2ang1
ri1si
ri3s2i2k1
ri1si3k2o
ri3s2ing
ri2s1ta
ri2s1ti
1ri1te1ra
1ri1te1ri1
ri1ti
ri3t2ing1
ri1to
ri1to1ri1
ri1u
ri1u2t1
r1j
r1ja2ng3
r1ju2n1
r1ju2n2g1
r1k
r1ka2m1
r1ka3m2en
r1ka3m2u
r2k1ti
r1l
2r1li
r1li2ng
r1m
r1mo1sfer
r1mo1stat
r1n
2r1nyu2t1
ro1be2h1
1ro1be2k1
ro1bo
ro1bo2h1
ro1bo2t1
ro1i
ro1id
ro3k2o2k1
ro3k2o2t1
rom1b
1rom1ba2k1
rom1beng1
rom1pa2k1
rom1pi
rom1po2k1
ron1
ro1n2a
r2on1dok
r2on1dol
1r2on1dong
ro1n2e1
1ron2g1
1r2o2n2g1ga
1ro1n2i
2ro1n2ik
2r2o1n2o
1ron1ta
1r2on1ta2k1
2ron1ta1si
ron2t1gen
r2on1to
ro1ra
1r2o1soh
1r2o1sok
1r2o1song
1r2o1so2t1
ro1yo2k1
ro1yo2ng1
2r1p
r1q
r1r
r1s
r1t
r1te1ta2k1
ru1bi
ru1bi2n1
ru1bu2h1
ru1bu2t1
ru1du2k1
ru1j
ru1ju2k1
ruk
ru1ku
ru1ku2n1
ru3k2u2t1
rum
ru1ma
1r2u1ma2h1
ru1ma1ni1a
rum1bai
rum1bi1a
1r2um1bu
ru1mi2t1
rum1p
1rum1pu2t1
ru1mu
ru1muk
ru1mu2n1
3r4u1mu2s1
run1d
ru2n1da
1r2un1ding
run1kel
1run1t
1run1tu2h1
2r1un1tu2k1
r1un1tu2n
1run1yu
1r2u1pa
ru3pa1i
2r3u1pa1ya
1r2u1pu2k1
1r2u1pu2t1
ru1ru
ru1sa
ru3s2a2k1 %%
ru1su2h1
ru3t2ak
ru1we2t1
r1v
r1w
r1y
r1z
sa1ba
sa1ba2r3
sab1da1
sab1da1la2h
sa1bot1
sa1bo1t2a1se
sa1da
sa1da2p1
sa1da2r3
sa1hu2t1
sa1ing1
sa1ins
saint
sa1ka
sa1ka1rin
sa1king
sa1ki2t1
sal
sa1la
sa1la2h1
sa1le
sa1le2h1
sa1le2p1
sal1i1
sa1l2i2b1
sa1l2i2n1
sa1l2i2n2g
sa1l2i3n2i1sa1si
sa1l2i3n2i1tas
sa2l3i3n4ya
sa1l2i1ra
sa1lu
sa1lu2r1
sa1ma
sam1an
sa1ma1na
sa1m2a1ny
sa1ma2r1
sam1b
sam1bu2t1
sam1p
sam1pa1nye
san1ca
san1d
san1da2r1
sa1ng2a2r1
sa1ng2a2t1
sang1g
sang1ga2h1
san2g1gra2h1
sa2ng1gu2p1
sang1k
sang1ka2l1
sang1ku2t1
san1sker1ta
san1t
san1ta2p1
sa1ra
sa1ra1kan
sa3r2a1na
sa1ra2p1
sa1ri
sa1ri4ng1
sas1t2e1ra
sas1t2ra
sa1ti
sa1tir
sa1u1di
sa1u2h1
sa1us
sa1ya
sa1ya2ng1
sa1yem1ba1ra1
sa1yu
sa1yung
sa1yu2r1
s1b
sbb
s1c
s1d
sdr
se1
se1bu
se1bu1kan
se1da
se1da1han
se1da2k1
se1da3r2i
se1ha
se1ha2t1
se1ha3t2i
se1i
se2in
se3in1dah
se3i1ngat
se1ka
se1ka2p1an
se1ka1ta
se1ka2t1an
se1ka1ti
se1ka1ut
se2k1r
se2k1ri
sek1sa
sek1si
sek1st
sek1stet
sek1su1al
sek1su1a1li
sek1su1a2l1is1me
se1ku
se1kun1der
se1la
se1la1da
se1la2m1
se1la3m2a1
se1la3m2a2t1
se1la1pan
se1la1pan1an
se1la2t1
se1li
se1li2ng1
se1lo
se1lo1ka
se1lu
se1lui
sem
se1ma
se1ma1nga2t1
se1ma1ra
se1ma3r4a2k1
se1ma2r1an
se1ma3r2ang
se1ma1ta
se1ma2t1an
se1me
se1mi
se1mu
se1mu2t3
.sen
se1na
se1na2k1
se1na1pan1
se2n1d
sen1de2r
sen1de3ri
sen1de3ru
se2n1d2ra
se1ne
se2ng1
se3ng2a1j
se3ng2a2l1
se3ng2a2m1
se3ng2a2p1
se3ng2a2r1
se3ng2a3r2at
se3ng2a3r2ing
se3ng2a2t1
se3ng2au
se3ng2ek
se3ng2e2t1
se3ng2i2t1
se3ng2u2k1
se3ng2u1ngu
se3ng2u2t1
se1n2i1
se1ni2k
se1ni3ku
se1n2i2n
se2n1j
se1n2o1
se2n1s
se2n1t
se2n1ta1ka
se2n1ta2k1an
se2n1ta1se
1s2en1ter
se2n1ti1
se2n1ti2f
sen1ti2l1
sen1ti3l2i
se2n1ti2ng
sen1tri2s1
sen1tri3s2i1tas
se2n1tu2h1
se3n2y
se1o
se1oul
se1pa
se1pa2k1
se1pa3k2a2t1
se1pa1nyol
se1pe
se1pe1san
se1po
se1poi
se2p1tem1ber
1sep1ti
1sep1tik
ser
se1ra
se1ra1bu2t1
se1ra1gam
se1ra2h1
se1ra3h2i
se1ra2k1
se1ra3k2a2h1
se1rap
se1ra1pah
se1ra2p1an
se1ra1sa
se1ra1sah
se3r4a3t2u2ng1
se1ra1wak
se2r1b
se2r1ba1
se2r1ba2n1
se2r1ba3n2e1
ser1ba2n1kan
se2r1ba1sa1m2a
se2r1bu1
se2r1bu2k1
se2r1da1
se1re
ser1g
se2r1ga2p1
se1ri
se1ri1bu
se1ro
se1rong
se2r1p
se2r1pi2h1
se2r1ta1
se2r1ti1
se1ru
seru1l2ing %%
se1run1tun
se1ru2t1an
ses
se1sa
se1se
se3si
se1ta
se1ta2n1
se1ta3n2a
se1ta2n2g1
se1ta3n2g2an
se1ta3r4a
se1te
se1te1la
se1te2l1an
se1te2m1
se1te1ru1
se1te1ru2s
se1ti
se1tir
se1to2p1
se1to2r1
se2t1r
se1u
se2u1da1ti
se2y1chel
s1f
s1fe1ra
s1g
s1h
si1a
si1al1an
si1a1pa
si1a2p1an
si1a2r1
si1bo1ri
si1bu2k1
si1li
si1lin1der
sim1b
sim1bol
sim1bo1li
sim1bo2l1is1me
sim1p
sim1pa2n1
sim1pa2n2g3
sim1pu2l1
si1na
si1na2r3
sin1den
sin1di2r1
sin1drom
si1n2et1ron
sing1
si1ng2a
sing1ga2h1
sing1ki2r1
sin1k
sin1k2r
s2i3n2ya
sir
si1ra
si1ra2m1
si2r1an
si1ra2p1
si1ra2t1
si1re1ne
si1ri2h1
si1ri2p1
si1si
si1si2p1
1sis1w
sit1rat
s1j
s1k
s2ka1la
s2ke1
s2ke2p1tis
s2ke2t1sa
s2kop
1s2kor2s
s1l
slo1wa1ki1a
s1m
s1n
so1a2l1
so1go2k1
sol1de2r
so1le2k1
so1li
so1li1de2r
som1p2ret
son
so1na1
so1na2n
so1na3non
so1na2r
so1ngo
son1t
son1te2k1
so1pa2n1
so1r
so1r2ai
so3r4a2k1
so2r1ben
so1r2o2t1
so2r2p1
s1p
spa1ge1ti
s2pa1nyol
s2pek1si
1s2pi1nal
spon1sor
3s2po1ra1
3s2po1ro
sport
spor1tif
s1q
s1r
s1s
s1t
s2tan1dar1
s1ta1si1
s1ta1si1nya
s2tat
ste2i
ste1no1
ste1re1o1
ste1re1o1skop
ste1ril
ste1to1skop
s2to1la
stra1to
stres
1s2truk1t
su
su1a
su1ai
su1al
su1a1li
su1a2l1is1me
su1a2p1
su1a3r4a
sub1or1
su1da
su1da2h1
su1gu2h1
su1k
su1ka1i
su1ka1i1nya
su1ka2r1an
su2k1ma
su2k1ses1
su1ling
su1li2t1
sul1t
sul1ta2n1
su1lu
su3l2uk
su1ma
su1ma1tra
sum1b
1sum1ber
sum1p
sum1pa2h1
sun
su3n2a2h
su1na2t1
sun1da2l1
sun1da2l1a2n1
su1ngai
sung1gu2h1
su1ngu
su1ngu2t1
su2n1t
su2n1ti2k1
su1nyi
su1pe
su1pe2r1
su1pe3r2i1or1
su1pe2r1s2
su1r
su2r1ga
su1ru2h1
su1r2u2p1
su2r1vei
su2r1ya
su1sa
su1sa2h1
su1sa2h1a2n1
su1su1
su1su2h1
su1su2k1
su1su3k2an1
su1su2l1
su1su3l2ah
su1su2n1
su1su2p1
su1su2t1
su1te1ra
su1tra1
su1ve1nir
s1v
s1w
swa1na1ma
swa1si1land
swiss
swt
sy
syah
sya1ha
sya1hi
sya1ir
sya1ra1kat
sya1ra2t1
syat1
sye1ra
syi1rik
syu1ha1da
1syu1ku2r1
syu1r2uk
s1z
ta
ta1a
ta1a2t1
ta1ba2h1
ta1ba2n1
ta1br4a2k1
ta1bu
ta1bu2h1
ta1bu1la1tor
ta1di
ta1di1lah
ta1gi
ta1gi2h1
ta1ha2n1
ta1ha2p1
tah1bi2s1
ta1hu
ta1hu2n1
ta1ja2m1
ta1ka
ta1ka2r1
tak1di2r1
ta3k2el
ta1kha1yul
ta1ku2t1
ta1la
ta2l1an
ta3l2ang
ta1ma
ta1ma2k1
ta1ma2t1
tam1b
tam1ba2l1
tam1p
tam1pa2r1
tam1pi2l1
ta1mu1
ta1na
ta1na2m1
tan1d
tan1da1i1
tan1du2s1
tang1
t2a1ng2an1
tang1gu1lang1
tanginy
ta1ng2i2s1
tang1k
tang1ka2i1
tang1ka2p1
tang1ka2s1
tang1ki2s1
ta1ng2o
tank
tan1ku
tan1ta2ng3
tan1te
ta1nya1
ta1nya1m2u
ta3p2ek
ta1pi
ta1pi1o1ka
ta1ra
ta1ra1b
ta3r2a1kan
ta1ri
ta1ri1a
ta1ri1a2n1
ta1ri2k1
ta1ri2k2h
tar1sel
tar1su
3t2ar1sus
ta1ru
ta1ru2h1
tas1
tase
ta2s1i
ta2s1i1nya
ta3s2i2s
ta1ta
ta1ta1ba1ha1sa
ta1ta2h1
ta1ta2n1
ta3t2a2n2g1
ta1ta2p1
ta1ta2r1
ta1to
ta1to2r1
ta1to3r2i
ta1tu
ta3t2u2s1
ta1wa
ta1wa1l
ta1wa2n1
ta1wa2r1
ta1wa3r2ikh
t1b
t1c
t1d
te1bu
te1bukan  % te-bu-kan dan te-buk-an
te1de4ng3 %%
tem1b
tem1bu4s3
tem1p
tem1pa2h1
tem1pa4t3i
tem1pe2l3
tem1pe3l4eng
tem1pe3r2a1tur
tem1pu2h1
tem1pu2r1
tem1pu3r2ung
ten1d
ten1der
te1nga1da2h1
te1nga2h1
te1ngak
te1nga1lan
te1nga2r
te1nga3ra
te1nga2s1
teng1g
teng1ge1la2m1
teng1ge2r1
teng1i
te1ng2ik
teng1k
teng1ko1ra2k1
te1ngo2k1
te1ngu
ten1t
ten1ta2ng3
ten1te1ra2m1
te1nu2l1
te1nu2n1
te1nu2n2g1
te1nu1sa
te1o
te1o1kra1
te1o1ri
te1pa
te1pa2t1
te1pu
te1pu2k1
ter1
te1r2a
te2r3a1b
te2r3a1d
te3r4a1da
te2r3a1gak
te2r2a1la % ter-a-la + te-ra-la
te2r3a1lah1
te2r3a1lang
te1r2a1li
te2r3am1bau
te2r3am1bil
te2r3am1bung
te1ran
te1r2a1na
te2r3a2n1cam
te1r2a2ng1
te2r3a3ng2ah
te2r3a2ng1kat
te2r3a2ng1kup
te1r2a1ni1a
te2r3a1ni1ay
te2r3a2n1ja
te2r3a2n1tuk
te1r2a1nya
te2r3a1nyar
te1r2a2p1
te1r2a3p2ang
te1r2a3p2eu
te1r2a3p2i
te2r3a3p2ung
te2r3a1r
te3r4a1ri
te1r2as
te1r2a1tai
te1r2a1tak
te1r2a1tu
te1r2a1wan
te1r2a1wang
ter1be1ti
ter1bi2t1
te1r2e1kam
ter1e1la2k1
te1ren
te1r2en1dah
te2r1en1dap
te1r2en1tang
te1r2e1o
te1r2i1
te1r2i1a2k1
te1r2i2k1
te1r2i3k2a
te2r3i3k2at
te1r2i2n1
te2r3i2n1di1ka1si
te1r2i2n2g
te2r3i3n2gat
te2r3i2n1jak
te1r2i3n2ya
te1ri1o
te1ri1or
te1ri1o1ri
te2r3i3ring
te2r3i1sak
te2r3i2s1ti1
ter2m
ter3ma
ter3me
ter3mi1
ter3mi2n
ter3mi3na
ter1mi1na1t
ter1mi3ni
ter3mi3no
ter3mi2s
ter3mo
te2r1te1ra
1t2e1si
3t2e1sis
te1te2k1
te1te2ng1
te1te2r1
te1te2r1an
te1te2s1
te1wa2s1
t1f
t1g
tgl
t1h
thai1land
ti1da2k1
ti1ka
ti1kai
ti1ka2m1
ti1la
ti3la2ng1
tim1b
tim1bu2n1
tin1d
tin1da2k1
1ting1
1ting1ga2l1
ti3pe
ti1pi
ti3p2i2s1
ti1pu
ti3pung
ti1r2
ti3r2ah
ti2r3ta
ti1ru
ti1ti
ti1ti2p1
ti1ti2r1
ti1ti2s1
ti1u
ti1u2p1
t1j
t1k
t1l
t1m
t1n
to1ko
to1ko2h1
to2k1ton
tok1tron
tol
to1la2k1
to1la2n1
to1leh
to1le1ran1
to1lo
to1lo2l1
to1ng2a
ton1jo2l1
ton1to2n1
to1ra
to1raks
to1re2h1
to1ret
to1ri1
to1ri1um
to1tal
to1ta1li1tas
to1ta1li1te2r3
t1p
t1q
tra1dik1si
tra1di1si
tra1di1si1o1na2l1
1tra1gus
t1rak
t2rak1t
t2rak1tir
trans1
tran1s2i
trans1por1ta1si
trau1ma
tri1ling
tri1li1u2n1
tri1ngen
tri1pleks
tro1br
t1ruh
t1s
t1t
tu1a
tu1a2t
tu1bu2h1
tu1d
tu1du2h1
tu1ha2n1
tu1kah
tu1kan %%
tu1ka2r1
tu1la
tu1la2r1
tu1li
tu1li2s1
tu1lu
tu1lu2s1
tum1b
tum1bu2h1
tum1p
tum1pa2h1
tum1pu2k1
tu1na
tu1n2a2i
tun1d
tun1du2k1
tu1ngau
tung1g
tung1ga2k1
tung1gu1
tung1gu2l1
tung1gu3l2ah
tun1j
tun1ju2k1
tun1t
tun1tu2n1
tun1tu2t1
tur2g
tur3gi
tu1ri
tu1ru
tu1ru2n1
tu3r2un2g
tu3r2u2t1
tu1to1
tuts
tu1tu
tu1tu2p1
t1v
t1w
t1y
t1z
u1a
u1a2k1
u1a3k2a
u1a3k2u
u1al
u1a1la
u1a1la1i1kum
u1ang
u1a2p1
u1a3p2a
u1a4p3an
u1a3p2u
u1a1ra
u1a1ra1kan
u1a1sa
u1a1sa3k2
u1ba
u1ba2h1
u1ba2h1a2n1
u1ba2n1
u1be
u1ber1an
u1bi
u1bo
u1bu
u1bu2ng3
u1ca
u1ca2p1
u1ce
u1ci
u1ci2l1
u1co
u1cu
u1da
u1da2h1
u1de
u1di
u1do
u1du
u1e
u1ens
u1en1si
u1fa
u1fe
u1fi
u1fo
u1fu
u1ga
u1ga2s1
u1ge
u1gi
u1go
u1gu
u1ha
u1he
u1hi
u1ho
u1hu
u1i
u1ja
u1ja2ng3
u1ja2r1
u1je
u1ji
u1jo
u1ju
u1ka
u1kar1a
u1ke
u1ki
u1ki2r1
u1kir1a2n
u1ko
u1kra1
u1kra1i1na
u1ku
u1ku1le1le
u1ku2p1
u1ku2r1
u1la
u1la2h1
u1lai1nya
u1lang1
u1la2r1an
u1la2s1
u1la3s2i
u1le
ul1i
u1l2i1ka
u1l2i1kan
u1l2in
uling
u1l3i1nya
u1l2i2s1
u2l3i2s1lam
u1lo
u1lu
u1lu2h1
u1lur1
u1ma
u1me
u1mi
u1mo
um1p
um1pa2h1
um1pa2s1
um1pu2k1
u1mu
u1mu2m1
u1na
u1nai
u1nai1kan
un1d
un1du2r1
u1ne
ung
u1ngar1an
ung1g
ung1ga2k1
ung1gu2l1
ung1k
ung1ka
ung1kap1an
u1ngu2t1
u1ni
un1j
un1ju2k1
u1no
un1su2r1
un1t
un1tung1
u1nu
u1nya
u1o
u1pa
upa1ca5ra
u1pa2h1
u1pa1ya1
u1pe
u1pi
u1po
u1pu
u1qa
u1qe
u1qi
u1qo
u1qu
ur1
u1ra
u1r4a2k1
u1r2a2p1
u1r2a2t1
u1re
u1ri
u1ro
u1ru
u1r2u1gu1ay
u1r2u2n1
u1r2u2n2g1
u1r2u3n2y2a
u1r2u2s1
u1r2u2t1
u1sa
u1sa1ha1
u1sa2t1
u1se
u1si
us1k
us1ku2p1
u1so
u1su
u1su2k1
u1su2l1
u1su2n1
u1sun2g
u1su2t1
u1ta
u1ta1ma
u1ta1ma3k2an1
u1tang1
u1tar
u1ta1ra
u1ta1r2a1kan
u3ta1si1
u1ta1si1nya
u1te
u1ti
u1to
u1tu
u1tu2h1
u1tu2p1
u1tu2r1
u1tu2s1
u1u
u1va
u1ve
u1vi
u1vo
u1vu
u1wa
u1we
u1wi
u1wo
u1wu
u1ya
u1ye
u1yi
u1yo
u1yu
u1za
u1ze
u1zi
u1zo
u1zu
va1to1ri
v1b
v1c
v1d
ve1ri
ve1te1r2an
v1f
v1g
v1h
vin1cen2t
vi1ru
vi1r2us
v1j
v1k
v1l
v1m
v1n
volt
vol1ta1se
v1p
v1q
v1r
v1s
v1t
v1v
v1w
v1y
v1z
wa1bah
wa1bau
wa1ca1na
wa1jib1
wa1jib1an1ku
wa1jik1
wa1ki2l1
wa1na
wan1an
wa1ngi
wan1t
wan1ta2h1
war1na1
war1ni1
wa1si
was3i3n2ya
wa3s2ir
was1pa1da1
watt
wa1wan1ca1ra1
w1b
w1c
w1d
we2r1a
we1reng1
w1f
w1g
w1h
wi1du1ri
wi1r2a
wi1r2a1kar1ya
w1j
w1k
w1l
w1m
w1n
w1p
w1q
w1r
w1s
w1t
w1v
w1w
w1y
w1z
xe1no1
xe1no1k2ra1
xe1ro1
yah1
yahu
ya1h2u1di
yak
ya1ki2n1
yard
y1b
y1c
y1d
y1f
y1g
y1h
y1j
y1k
y1l
y1m
y1n
y1p
y1q
y1r
y1s
y1t
yu1go1sla1vi1a
yu1ris1
y1v
y1w
y1y
y1z
za1ir
za1i1re
za1li2m1
za1li2m1a2n
z1b
z1c
z1d
z1f
z1g
z1h
zi1na
zi1ra2h1
z1j
z1k
z1l
z1m
z1n
z1p
z1q
z1r
z1s
z1t
zu1ri
z1v
z1w
z1y
z1z
